Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.385

Parkland trust revolving fund.

(1) The parkland trust revolving fund is to be utilized by the department for the purpose of acquiring real property, including all reasonable costs associated with these acquisitions, as a replacement for the property transferred to the state parks and recreation commission, as directed by the legislature in order to maintain the land base of the affected trusts or under RCW 79.22.060 and to receive voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the department.

(2)(a) Proceeds from transfers of real property to the state parks and recreation commission or other proceeds identified from transfers of real property as directed by the legislature shall be deposited in the parkland trust revolving fund.

(b) Subject to RCW 79.22.060(3), proceeds from real property transferred or disposed under RCW 79.22.060 must be used solely to purchase replacement forestland, that must be actively managed as a working forest, for the benefit of the county from which the property was transferred or disposed.

(c) Disbursement from the parkland trust revolving fund to acquire replacement property and for operating and maintaining public use and recreation facilities shall be on the authorization of the department.

(d) The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090 must be solely used for the purpose of operating and maintaining public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the department.

(3) In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the parkland trust revolving fund is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

(4) The department is authorized to solicit and receive voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the department. The department may seek voluntary contributions from individuals and organizations for this purpose. Voluntary contributions will be deposited into the parkland trust revolving fund and used solely for the purpose of public use and recreation facilities operations and maintenance. Voluntary contributions are not considered a fee for use of these facilities.

[ 2023 c 383 s 7; 2014 c 32 s 2; 2012 c 166 s 8. Prior: 2011 c 320 s 21; 2011 c 216 s 14; 2009 c 354 s 9; 2004 c 103 s 1; 2003 c 334 s 106; 2000 c 148 s 4; 1995 c 211 s 5. Formerly RCW 43.30.115.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 383: See note following RCW 79.17.300.

Findings—Intent—2012 c 166: See note following RCW 79.02.010.

Effective date—2011 c 320: See note following RCW 79A.80.005.

Findings—Intent—2011 c 320: See RCW 79A.80.005.

Finding—Intent—2009 c 354: See note following RCW 84.33.140.

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—Severability—1995 c 211: See notes following RCW 79A.05.070.